Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.745

Convicted persons, fingerprinting required, records—Furloughs, information to section, notice to local agencies—Arrests, disposition information—Convicts, information to section, notice to local agencies—Registration of sex offenders.

(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public safety of every county, of the chief of police of each city or town, or of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies operating within this state, to record the fingerprints of all persons held in or remanded to their custody when convicted of any crime as provided for in RCW 43.43.735 for which the penalty of imprisonment might be imposed and to disseminate and file such fingerprints in the same manner as those recorded upon arrest pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 and 43.43.740.

(2) Every time the secretary authorizes a furlough as provided for in RCW 72.66.012 the department of corrections shall notify, thirty days prior to the beginning of such furlough, the sheriff or director of public safety of the county to which the prisoner is being furloughed, the nearest Washington state patrol district facility in the county wherein the furloughed prisoner is to be residing, and other similar criminal justice agencies that the named prisoner has been granted a furlough, the place to which furloughed, and the dates and times during which the prisoner will be on furlough status. In the case of an emergency furlough the thirty-day time period shall not be required but notification shall be made as promptly as possible and before the prisoner is released on furlough.

(3) Disposition of the charge for which the arrest was made shall be reported to the section at whatever stage in the proceedings a final disposition occurs by the arresting law enforcement agency, county prosecutor, city attorney, or court having jurisdiction over the offense: PROVIDED, That the chief shall promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions of this subsection.

(4) Whenever a person serving a sentence for a term of confinement in a state correctional facility for convicted felons, pursuant to court commitment, is released on an order of the state indeterminate sentence review board, or is discharged from custody on expiration of sentence, the department of corrections shall promptly notify the sheriff or director of public safety, the nearest Washington state patrol district facility, and other similar criminal justice agencies that the named person has been released or discharged, the place to which such person has been released or discharged, and the conditions of his or her release or discharge.

Local law enforcement agencies shall require persons convicted of sex offenses to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130. In addition, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any local law enforcement authority from recording the residency and other information concerning any convicted felon or other person convicted of a criminal offense when such information is obtained from a source other than from registration pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130 which source may include any officer or other agency or subdivision of the state.

(5) The existence of the notice requirement in subsection (2) of this section will not require any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after notification.

[ 1994 c 129 s 7; 1993 c 24 s 1; 1990 c 3 s 409; 1985 c 346 s 6; 1973 c 20 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1994 c 129: See note following RCW 4.24.550.

Construction—Prior rules and regulations—1973 c 20: See note following RCW 72.66.010.